Idaho, session 2026, H0597.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-827A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-827A. POWERS AND DUTIES. The office of information technology ser-
vices is hereby authorized and directed:
(1)(a)(i) To control and approve the acquisition, purchase, and
installation of all information technology equipment, services,
software, and data management, and telecommunications equipment
and facilities for all departments and institutions of state gov-
ernment, except as provided in subparagraphs (ii), (iii) and (iv)
of this paragraph;
(ii) To coordinate the acquisition, purchase, and installation
of all information technology equipment, services, software, and
data management, and telecommunications equipment and facilities
for the institutions of higher education and the elected officers
in the executive branch;
(iii) To coordinate the acquisition, purchase, and installation
of all information technology equipment, services, software, and
data management, and telecommunications equipment and facilities
for the legislative and judicial branches;
(iv) Provided however, that the acquisition, purchase, and in-
stallation of all public safety and microwave equipment shall be
under the control of the military division. The military division
is authorized to charge and receive payment for actual and neces-
sary expenses incurred in providing services to any unit of state
government under the provisions of this subparagraph.
(b) In approving or directing the acquisition, purchase, or installa-
tion of information technology equipment, services, software, or data
management, or telecommunications equipment or facilities, the office
shall first consult with and consider the recommendations and advice
of the directors or executive heads of the various departments or in-
stitutions. For each purchase, the office shall conduct a technical
and financial analysis of the information technology equipment, ser-
vices, software, or data management, or telecommunications equipment
or facilities that best meet the needs of departments and institu-
tions of state government except as provided in paragraph (a)(ii),
(iii), and (iv) of this subsection. Such analysis may be conducted by


a third-party broker as long as fees are not charged to the office. The
third-party broker may charge a reasonable commission to the vendors
engaged by the office. The office, in its discretion, may also uti-
lize and enter into a memorandum of understanding with the division
of purchasing in the department of administration for procurements.
Except when utilizing the division of purchasing for procurements,
the office's purchase of information technology equipment, services,
software, and data management, and telecommunications equipment and
facilities are exempt from the provisions of chapters 52 and 92, title
67, Idaho Code. Any procurements less than fifteen thousand dollars
($15,000) are exempt from the provisions of this section and may be
purchased directly by the departments and institutions of state gov-
ernment except as provided in paragraph (a)(ii), (iii), and (iv) of
this subsection. Any acquisition, purchase, or installation of any
information technology equipment, services, software, or data manage-
ment, or telecommunications equipment or facilities that is contrary
to the office's direction or is not in harmony with the state's overall
plan for telecommunications and information sharing shall be reported
in writing to the governor and the legislature.
(2) To provide a system of information technology and telecommunica-
tions for all departments and institutions of state government. Funds re-
ceived pursuant to this subsection shall be appropriated for payment of any
charges related to information technology equipment, services, software,
and data management, and any telecommunications and telephone charges in-
curred by the various agencies and institutions of state government.
(3) To provide a means whereby political subdivisions of the state may
use the state telecommunications system, on such terms and under such condi-
tions as the office of information technology services may establish.
(4) To accept federal funds granted by congress or by executive order
for all or any of the purposes of this chapter, as well as gifts and donations
from individuals and private organizations or foundations.
(5) To oversee implementation of cybersecurity policies that foster
risk and cybersecurity management telecommunications and decision-making
with both internal and external organizational stakeholders.
(6) To consult with and direct state agencies and officials regarding
information security needs.
(7) To direct state agencies and officials on penetration tests and
vulnerability scans of state technology systems in order to identify steps
to mitigate identified risks.
(8) To direct state agencies and officials to ensure that state agen-
cies implement mandatory education and training of state employees and pro-
vide guidance on appropriate levels of training for various classifications
of state employees.
(9) To direct appropriate state agencies to create, coordinate, pub-
lish, routinely update and market a statewide cybersecurity website as an
information repository for intelligence-sharing and cybersecurity best
practices.
(10) To ensure that all state agencies implement and maintain cyberse-
curity best practices.


(11) To require all state agencies to implement and use multifactor
identification to access information technology devices or services, in-
cluding but not limited to local and remote network access to any email
accounts, cloud storage accounts, web applications, networks, databases, or
servers.
(12) To coordinate public and private entities to develop, create and
promote statewide public outreach efforts to protect personal information
and sensitive data from cyber threats.
(11) (13)(a) To obtain a criminal history check on prospective employ-
ees and contractors with the Idaho office of information technology
services who provide information technology (IT) services to external
state agency customers and who work in one (1) or more of the following
disciplines:
(i) IT network engineering;
(ii) IT operations and support;
(iii) IT software engineering;
(iv) Geographic information systems;
(v) IT information management;
(vi) IT database administration;
(vii) IT systems and infrastructure engineering;
(viii) IT information security engineering;
(ix) IT architecture;
(x) IT management;
(xi) Remote sensing analysis; and
(xii) Data science.
(b) The criminal history check done pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall be based on a completed ten (10) finger fingerprint
card or scan and shall include, at a minimum, information from the Idaho
bureau of criminal identification database and the federal bureau of
investigation's criminal history database.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "information technology" shall
have the same meaning as provided for in section 67-831, Idaho Code.
(12)(13) (14) To promulgate and adopt reasonable rules, subject to leg-
islative approval, for effecting the purposes of this act pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.